Nebraska, session 109, LB695.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB695 LB695
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) The community of Battle Creek, originally incorporated in 1873,
is an essential community of Legislative District No. 19. Battle Creek
provides for a high quality of life for its residents and employees for
local businesses and is essential for regional workforce housing;
(b) The existing road infrastructure in and around Battle Creek
requires protection from flooding. This infrastructure is vital for
public transportation using cars and buses and for businesses
transporting produce, raw materials, and finished products by truck; and
(c) Existing rail infrastructure in the area is critical to
supporting existing and future regional industries. These industries are
vital to the area and nation, and include essential agricultural and
metal industrial sites. These commercial taxpayers also lessen the
property tax burden on surrounding agricultural producers.
(2) In light of these findings, the Legislature declares that it is
essential to the people of Battle Creek, the surrounding region, and the
State of Nebraska that flood control improvements be made to protect
Battle Creek and downstream communities.
(3) The Lower Elkhorn Natural Resources District shall:
(a) Cause a dam to be built based upon the engineering design
reference number XXX of the XXX and take such other flood control
measures as are necessary;
(b) Not take any action or adopt an engineering design that will
accelerate the velocity or volume flow of the Elkhorn River downstream;
(c) Seek or secure any available local, state, and federal funds to
construct such dam and take such other flood control measures; and
(d) To the extent possible, by securing such other funding, reduce
or eliminate the need to raise the district's levy and thereby increase
taxes on district residents and businesses.
-2-